North Dakota, session 69, HB1599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-06-14.7 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-06-14.7. State leave sharing program - Rulemaking. (Retroactive application - See note )
1. The human resource management services division of the office of management and budget
shall establish a state leave sharing program for permanent employees of the state. The
program must provide for a mechanism for state employees to donate accrued annual and
sick leave to an employee who does not have available leave who is suffering from a severe,
extreme, or life-threatening condition, or who is caring for an immediate relative or household
member who is suffering from a severe, extreme, or life-threatening condition.
2. A temporary employee or contracted employee with a limited-term appointment is not eligible
to participate in the leave sharing program. An employee may not use more than four months
donated leave in any twelve-month period and an employee may not retain leave beyond the
occurrence necessitating the leave.
3. The human resource management services division shall:
a. Require medical certification from a physician, physician assistant, psychologist, or
advanced practice nurse practitioner verifying the severe, extreme, or life-threatening
nature of the medical condition and the expected duration of the condition;
b. Track the amount of leave taken by permanent state employees under the program; and
c. Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32 to implement this section.

H. B. NO. 1599 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1599.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State